Illinois, session 104th, HB2065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Charitable Trust Stabilization Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 790/15)7    Sec. 15. Grant eligibility. To be eligible to receive a 8grant under this Act, an organization must be a 9community-based organization or other not-for-profit entity 10that:11        (1) is a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt 12    from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of 13    the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986;14        (2) is organized under the General Not for Profit 15    Corporation Act of 1986 for the purpose of providing 16    charitable services to the community; and17        (3) complies with the provisions of the Charitable 18    Trust Act; .19        (4) provides evidence of good standing from the 20    Illinois Secretary of State; 21        (5) provides documentation showing that the 22    organization is currently registered with the Illinois 23    Attorney General's Charitable Trust Bureau and copies of   HB2065 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11532 SPS 21621 b1    the organization's AG-990-IL Illinois Charitable 2    Organization Annual Report for each of the past three 3    years;4        (6) certifies that it has adopted a nondiscrimination 5    policy that complies with the Illinois Human Rights Act 6    and all applicable federal and State laws; and7        (7) has at least one of the following:8            (A) the equivalent of one full-time paid employee; 9        or10            (B) a designated fiscal agent and a physical 11        office address from which charitable services are 12        provided. 13(Source: P.A. 95-655, eff. 6-1-08.)